California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) The department may recover costs of administering the projects and related costs through interest earnings up to 5 percent of the project loan amounts. Project costs can include energy efficiency improvements and costs associated with managing the
 project and administering the loan program, including all reporting requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 36, Sec. 18.   (SB 862)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.8. Energy Conservation in Transportation [25480. - 25485.]

25480.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 686.)
-------------------------------------------

25481.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) Due to the projected rapid growth in demand for energy, coupled with the mounting difficulties in providing energy supplies, a continuing energy shortage exists, posing a significant danger to public health and welfare.

(b) The use of the automobile represents the single largest use of energy in this state and, therefore, the growing use of energy by automobiles is a major factor contributing to such shortage.

(c) Heavy automobile traffic in our major cities has resulted in serious problems of air pollution and traffic congestion.

(d) Increased ridesharing by commuters would aid in lowering air pollution levels, conserving energy, and reducing urban traffic congestion.

It is, therefore, the purpose of this chapter to provide incentives for the wider use of ridesharing by commuters in metropolitan areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 290.)
-------------------------------------------

25482.

All state agencies shall provide assistance to their employees living in metropolitan areas in establishing carpools and locating potential carpool participants. The department shall be responsible for coordinating these efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 595, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25483.

In order to perform its new function of promoting and assisting ridesharing, the department is authorized to establish ridesharing programs in metropolitan areas for public and private employees with funds made available for such purpose from any source. The ridesharing programs may be established and maintained entirely by the department or by the department in cooperation with public or private parties pursuant to contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 290.)
-------------------------------------------

25484.

The ridesharing programs established by the department may include, but are not limited to, computer or manual matching systems, promotional efforts to encourage carpooling, vanpooling, buspooling, and flexible work hours, and preferential treatment on highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 290.)
-------------------------------------------

25485.

The department shall develop programs and undertake any necessary construction to establish, for the use of carpool vehicles carrying at least three persons, preferential lanes on major freeways in metropolitan areas where the total benefits to the carpool vehicles will bear a reasonable relationship to the total adverse effects on the remaining vehicles, as established on the basis of an engineering study. The department shall also permit such carpool vehicles to have access to preferential bus lanes established on major freeways, unless congestion seriously impeding the travel of buses will result or will present a serious traffic hazard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 686.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.9. Energy Systems [25487. - 25498.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [25487. - 25498.]

25487.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25488.

“Title 24 Standards” refers to the nonresidential building standards developed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25488.5.

“Building standard” means a building standard as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code which is adopted by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

25489.

“Lifecycle cost” means an estimate of the total cost of acquisition, operation, maintenance, and construction of any energy system within or related to a structure over the design life of the structure. “Life cycle cost” includes, but is not limited to, the cost of fuel, materials, machinery, ancillary devices, labor, service, replacement, and repairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25491.

“Governmental agency” means any public agency, including any agency of the state, each county, city, district, association of governments, and joint power agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25492.

“Structure” means any building which has more than 10,000 square feet of floor area and which has a heating, cooling, water heating, or lighting system which is designed to provide lighting and space conditioning more than 1,000 hours per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25493.

On or after January 1, 1979, no governmental agency shall commence construction on any new structure unless the new structure complies with Title 24 Standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25493.5.

On and after January 1, 1980, no governmental agency shall commence construction on any new structure unless the new structure complies with all applicable building standards, as defined in Section 25488.5 and published in the State Building Standards Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

25494.

Not later than July 31, 1978, the commission shall prepare a manual outlining a methodology by which governmental agencies and the general public may at their option compare the lifecycle costs of various building design alternatives. This manual will provide the information and procedures necessary to evaluate a building’s lifecycle costs in the microclimate and utility service area where it is to be built.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25495.

No later than July 31, 1978, the commission shall develop design guidelines for new construction which include energy conserving options, including, but not limited to, the use of daylighting, heating ventilation and air conditioning economizer cycles, natural ventilation, building envelope solar heat gain control mechanisms, and alternative energy systems such as solar energy for space heating and water heating and load management strategies. These guidelines and the cost analysis done pursuant to Section 25494 may be considered by government agencies at their option for ultimate selection of a building design in the competitive bidding process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25496.

No later than July 1, 1978, the commission shall develop and make available to government agencies and the general public to be utilized at their option lighting standards for existing buildings. These standards shall address, but not be limited to, task and general area lighting levels, light switching and control mechanisms, and lighting energy budgets. The commission may provide advice and recommendations to the public or any governmental agency as to the standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

25498.

In addition to any other requirements applicable to such structure, no new state-owned structure shall be constructed which is not equipped with a supplementary solar water heating system, unless such structure is specifically exempted from this requirement by the State Architect for reasons of economic or physical infeasibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Power Facility and Site Certification [25500. - 25543.]

25500.

In accordance with the provisions of this division, the commission shall have the exclusive power to certify all sites and related facilities in the state, whether a new site and related facility or a change or addition to an existing facility. The issuance of a certificate by the commission shall be in lieu of any permit, certificate, or similar document required by any state, local or regional agency, or federal agency to the extent permitted by federal law, for such use of the site and related facilities, and shall supersede any applicable statute, ordinance, or regulation of any state, local, or regional agency, or federal agency to the extent permitted by federal law.

After the effective date of this division, no construction of any facility or modification of any existing facility shall be commenced without first obtaining certification for any such site and related facility by the commission, as prescribed in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

25500.1.

(a) The owner of a proposed solar thermal powerplant, for which an application for certification was filed with the commission after August 15, 2007, and certified by the commission and, of a project on federal land, for which a record of decision was issued by the Department of the Interior or the Bureau of Land Management before September 1, 2011, may petition the commission not later than June 30, 2012, to review an amendment to the facility’s certificate to convert the facility, in whole or in part, from solar thermal technology to photovoltaic technology, without the need to file an entirely new application for
 certification or notice of intent pursuant to Section 25502, provided that the commission prepares supplemental environmental review documentation, provides for public notice and comment on the supplemental environmental review, and holds at least one public hearing on the proposal.

(b) The Department of Fish and Game and the State Water Resources Board shall provide comments to the commission on the water resource and water quality effects of the proposed powerplants. The commission shall incorporate all feasible mitigation measures identified by the department and the board.

(c) For a facility specified in subdivision (a), this chapter shall continue to apply, notwithstanding that the facility or part of the facility would otherwise be excluded pursuant to Section 25120.

(d) The commission shall process a petition
 submitted under this section pursuant to Section 1769 of Title 20 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) This section shall not apply to any project if the project’s certificate was timely challenged pursuant to Section 25531, unless the challenge was subsequently dismissed by the California Supreme Court.

(f) This section does not abrogate a party’s right to challenge a project’s certification pursuant to Section 25531 or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   (AB 1073)   Effective May 23, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25500.5.

The commission shall certify sufficient sites and related facilities which are required to provide a supply of electric power sufficient to accomodate the demand projected in the most recent forecast of statewide and service area electric power demands adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25309.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25501.

This chapter does not apply to any site or related facility for which the Public Utilities Commission has issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity or which any municipal utility has approved before January 7, 1975.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25501.7.

Any person proposing to construct a facility or a site to which Section 25501 applies may waive the exclusion of such site and related facility from the provisions of this chapter by submitting to the commission a notice to that effect on or after July 1, 1976, and any and all of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the construction of such facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25502.

Each person proposing to construct a thermal powerplant or electric transmission line on a site shall submit to the commission a notice of intention to file an application for the certification of the site and related facility or facilities. The notice shall be an attempt primarily to determine the suitability of the proposed sites to accommodate the facilities and to determine the general conformity of the proposed sites and related facilities with standards of the commission and assessments of need adopted pursuant to Sections 25305 to 25308, inclusive. The notice shall be in the form prescribed by the commission and shall be supported by such information as the commission may require.

Any site and related facility once found to be acceptable pursuant to Section 25516 is, and shall continue to be, eligible for consideration in an application for certification without further proceedings required for a notice under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1184, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

25502.3.

Except as provided in Section 25501.7, any person proposing to construct a facility excluded from the provisions of this chapter may waive such exclusion by submitting to the commission a notice of intention to file an application for certification, and any and all of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the construction of such facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.

Each notice of intention to file an application shall contain at least three alternative sites and related facilities, at least one of which shall not be located in whole or in part in the coastal zone. In addition, the alternative sites and related electrical facilities may be proposed from an inventory of sites which have previously been approved by the commission in a notice of intent or may be proposed from sites previously examined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

25504.

The notice of intention shall include a statement by the applicant describing the location of the proposed sites by section or sections, range and township, and county; a summary of the proposed design criteria of the facilities; the type or types of fuels to be used; the methods of construction and operation; the proposed location of facilities and structures on each site; a preliminary statement of the relative economic, technological, and environmental advantages and disadvantages of the alternative site and related facility proposals; a statement of need for the facility and information showing the compatibility of the proposals with the most recent electricity report issued pursuant to Section 25308; and any other information that an electric utility deems desirable to submit to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1184, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

25504.5.

An applicant may, in the notice, propose a site to be approved which will accomodate a potential maximum electric generating capacity in excess of the capacity being proposed for the initial approval of the commission. If such a proposal is made, the notice shall include, but not be limited to, in addition to the information specified in Section 25504, all of the following:

(a) The number, type, and energy source of electric generating units which the site is proposed ultimately to accomodate and the maximum generating capacity for each unit.

(b) The projected installation schedule for each unit.

(c) The impact at the site when fully developed, on the environment and public health and safety.

(d) The amount and sources of cooling water needed at the fully developed site.

(e) The location and specifications of auxiliary facilities planned for each state of development including, but not limited to, pipelines, waste storage facilities, fuel storage facilities, switchyards, coolant lines, coolant outfalls, and cooling ponds, lakes, or towers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25505.

Upon receipt of a notice, the commission shall cause a summary of the notice to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the sites and related facilities, or any part thereof, designated in the notice are proposed to be located. The commission shall also transmit a copy of the notice to the Public Utilities Commission, for sites and related facilities requiring a certificate of public convenience and necessity, and to other federal, state, regional, and local agencies having an interest in matters pertinent to the proposed facilities at any of the alternative sites. A copy of the notice shall also be transmitted to the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25506.

The commission shall request the appropriate local, regional, state, and federal agencies to make comments and recommendations regarding the design, operation, and location of the facilities designated in the notice, in relation to environmental quality, public health and safety, and other factors on which they may have expertise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25506.5.

The commission shall request the Public Utilities Commission, for sites and related facilities requiring a certificate of public convenience and necessity, to make comments and recommendations regarding the design, operation, and location of the facilities designated in the notice in relation to the economic, financial, rate, system reliability, and service implications of the proposed facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25507.

(a) If any alternative site and related facility proposed in the notice is proposed to be located, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone, the commission shall transmit a copy of the notice to the California Coastal Commission. The California Coastal Commission shall analyze the notice and prepare the report and findings prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 30413 prior to commencement of hearings pursuant to Section 25513.

(b) If any alternative site and related facility proposed in the notice is proposed to be located, in whole or in part, within the Suisun Marsh, or within the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the commission shall transmit a copy of the notice to the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission. The San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission shall analyze the notice and prepare the report and findings prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 66645 of the Government Code prior to commencement of hearings pursuant to Section 25513.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25508.

The commission shall cooperate with, and render advice to, the California Coastal Commission and the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission in studying applications for any site and related facility proposed to be located, in whole or in part, within the coastal zone, the Suisun Marsh, or the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission if requested by the California Coastal Commission or the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, as the case may be. The California Coastal Commission or the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, as the case may be, may participate in public hearings on the notice and on the application for site and related facility certification as an interested party in such proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

25509.

Within 45 days of the filing of the notice, the commission shall conduct public informational presentations in the county or counties in which the proposed sites and related facilities are located. The place of such public informational presentations shall be as close as practicable to the proposed sites. Such presentations shall be for the purpose of setting forth the electrical demand basis for the proposed site and related facility and providing knowledge and understanding of the proposed facilities and sites.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25509.5.

No sooner than 15 days after the conclusion of the presentations pursuant to Section 25509, the commission shall commence nonadjudicatory hearings. Such hearings shall identify issues for adjudication in hearings pursuant to Section 25513, issues which may be eliminated from further consideration in the notice proceedings, and issues which should be deferred to the certification proceeding. Any person may participate to the extent deemed reasonable and relevant by the presiding member of the commission in any such hearing. In scheduling such hearings the presiding member shall confer with the public adviser to provide that the hearing dates and locations are as convenient as possible for interested parties and the public. Such hearings shall be conducted in order to accomplish all of the following purposes:

(a) To set forth the electrical demand basis for the proposed site and related facility.

(b) To provide knowledge and understanding of proposed facilities and sites. 

(c) To obtain the views and comments of the public, parties, and concerned governmental agencies on the environmental, public health and safety, economic, social, and land use impacts of the facility at the proposed sites.

(d) To solicit information regarding reasonable alternative sources of the electric generating capacity or energy to be provided by alternative sites and related facilities, or combinations thereof, which will better carry out the policies and objectives of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25510.

After the conclusion of such hearings, and no later than 150 days after filing of the notice, the commission shall prepare and make public a summary and hearing order on the notice of intention to file an application. The commission may include within the summary and hearing order any other alternatives proposed by the commission or presented to the commission at a public hearing prior to preparation of the summary and hearing order. The summary and hearing order shall be published and made available to the public and to interested local, regional, state, and federal agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25511.

The commission shall review the factors related to safety and reliability of the facilities at each of the alternative sites designated in the notice. In addition to other information requested of the applicant, the commission shall, in determining the appropriateness of sites and related facilities, require detailed information on proposed emergency systems and safety precautions, plans for transport, handling and storage of wastes and fuels, proposed methods to prevent illegal diversion of nuclear fuels, special design features to account for seismic and other potential hazards, proposed methods to control density of population in areas surrounding nuclear powerplants, and such other information as the commission may determine to be relevant to the reliability and safety of the facility at the proposed sites. The commission shall analyze the information provided by the applicant, supplementing it, where necessary, by onsite investigations and other studies. The commission shall determine the adequacy of measures proposed by the applicant to protect public health and safety, and shall include its findings in the final report required by Section 25514.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25512.

The summary and hearing order shall be based upon the record of the proceeding including statements or documents presented during any hearing or informational presentation on the notice, the comments transmitted by the Public Utilities Commission and local, regional, state, and federal agencies and the public to the commission, and independent studies conducted by the commission’s staff.

The summary and hearing order shall:

(a) Identify those issues for consideration in hearings pursuant to Section 25513.

(b) Identify those issues which may be eliminated from further consideration in the notice of intention proceedings.

(c) Identify those issues which should be deferred to the certification proceeding.

(d) Contain proposed findings on matters relevant to the provisions of Section 25514.

(e) Specify dates for the adjudicatory hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25512.5.

Within 15 days of the publication of the summary and hearing order, a copy will be distributed to any person who requests such copy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25513.

No earlier than 30 days after distribution of the summary and hearing order, the commission shall commence adjudicatory hearings pursuant to the hearing order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25513.3.

Notwithstanding Sections 11425.30 and 11430.10 of the Government Code, unless a party demonstrates other statutory grounds for disqualification, a person who has served as investigator or advocate in an adjudicative proceeding of the commission under this code may serve as a supervisor of the presiding officer or assist or advise the presiding officer in the same proceeding if the service, assistance, or advice occurs more than one year after the time the person served as investigator or advocate, provided the content of any advice is disclosed on the record and all parties have an opportunity to comment on the advice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 82.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

25514.

After conclusion of the hearings held pursuant to Section 25513 and no later than 300 days after the filing of the notice, a final report shall be prepared and distributed. The final report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The findings and conclusions of the commission regarding the conformity of alternative sites and related facilities designated in the notice or considered in the notice of intention proceeding with both of the following:

(1) The 12-year forecast of statewide and service area electric power demands adopted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 25305, except as provided in Section 25514.5.

(2) Applicable local, regional, state, and federal standards, ordinances, and laws, including any long-range land use plans or guidelines adopted by the state or by any local or regional planning agency, which would be applicable but for the exclusive authority of the commission to certify sites and related facilities; and the standards adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 25216.3.

(b) Any findings and comments submitted by the California Coastal Commission pursuant to Section 25507 and subdivision (d) of Section 30413.

(c) Any findings and comments submitted by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission pursuant to Section 25507 of this code and subdivision (d) of Section 66645 of the Government Code.

(d) The commission’s findings on the acceptability and relative merit of each alternative siting proposal designated in the notice or presented at the hearings and reviewed by the commission. The specific findings of relative merit shall be made pursuant to Sections 25502 to 25516, inclusive. In its findings on any alternative siting proposal, the commission may specify modification in the design, construction, location, or other conditions which will meet the standards, policies, and guidelines established by the commission.

(e) Findings and conclusions with respect to the safety and reliability of the facility or facilities at each of the sites designated in the notice, as determined by the commission pursuant to Section 25511, and any conditions, modifications, or criteria proposed for any site and related facility proposal resulting from the findings and conclusions.

(f) Findings and conclusions as to whether increased property taxes due to the construction of the project are sufficient to support needed local improvements and public services required to serve the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 4.   Effective May 22, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25514.3.

In specifying any modifications, conditions, or criteria pursuant to Section 25514, for sites and related facilities requiring a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the commission shall request the comments and recommendations of the Public Utilities Commission on the economic, financial, rate, system reliability, and service implications of such modifications, conditions, or criteria.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25514.5.

In considering the acceptability of a site proposed to accommodate ultimately additional power-generating capacity, the commission, in determining, pursuant to Sections 25514 and 25512, the conformity of the facilities proposed in the notice with the 12-year forecast of statewide and service area electric power demands adopted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 25305, shall base its determination only on such initial facilities as are proposed for operation within the forthcoming 12-year period. Additional facilities projected to be operating at the site at a time beyond the forthcoming 12-year period shall not be considered in the determination of conformity with the electric power demand forecast.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1184, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

25515.

No later than 30 days after the final report is distributed, a hearing or hearings on the final report shall be commenced. Such hearings shall be concluded within 15 days of their commencement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25516.

The approval of the notice by the commission shall be based upon findings pursuant to Section 25514. The notice shall not be approved unless the commission finds at least two alternative site and related facility proposals considered in the commission’s final report as acceptable. If the commission does not find at least two sites and related facilities acceptable, additional sites and related facilities may be proposed by the applicant which shall be considered in the same manner as those proposed in the original notice.

If the commission finds that a good faith effort has been made by the person submitting the notice to find an acceptable alternative site and related facility and that there is only one acceptable site and related facility among those submitted, the commission may approve the notice based on the one site and related facility. If a notice is approved based on one site and related facility, the commission may require a new notice to be filed to identify acceptable alternative sites and related facilities for the one site and related facility approved unless suitable alternative sites and related facilities have been approved by the commission in previous notice of intention proceedings.

If the commission finds that additional electric generating capacity is needed to accommodate the electric power demand forecast pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 25305 and, after the commission finds that a good faith effort was made by the person submitting the notice to propose an acceptable site and related facility, it fails to find any proposed site and related facility to be acceptable, the commission shall designate, at the request of and at the expense of the person submitting the notice, a feasible site and related facility for providing the needed electric generating capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1184, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

25516.1.

If a site and related facility found to be acceptable by the commission pursuant to Section 25516 is located in the coastal zone, the Suisun Marsh, or the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, no application for certification may be filed pursuant to Section 25519 unless the commission has determined, pursuant to Section 25514, that such site and related facility have greater relative merit than available alternative sites and related facilities for an applicant’s service area which have been determined to be acceptable by the commission pursuant to Section 25516.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

25516.5.

On a notice which proposes an expanded ultimate electric generating capacity for a site, the commission may, based upon findings pursuant to Section 25514, either approve the notice only for the initial facility or facilities proposed for operation within the forthcoming 12-year period or may approve the notice for the initial facility or facilities and find the site acceptable for additional generating capacity of the type tentatively proposed. The maximum allowable amount and type of such additional capacity shall be determined by the commission.

If a notice is approved which includes a finding that a particular site is suitable to accommodate a particular additional generating capacity, the site shall be designated a potential multiple-facility site. The commission may, in determining the acceptability of a potential multiple-facility site, specify conditions or criteria necessary to insure that future additional facilities will not exceed the limitations of the site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

25516.6.

(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this division, the commission shall issue its written decision on the notice not later than 12 months after the notice is filed, or at any later time as is mutually agreed upon by the commission and the applicant.

(b) The commission shall determine, within 45 days after it receives the notice, whether the notice is complete. If the commission determines that the notice is complete, the notice shall be deemed filed for the purpose of this section on the date that this determination is made. If the commission determines that the notice is incomplete, the commission shall specify, in writing, those parts of the notice which are incomplete and shall indicate the manner in which it can be made complete. If the applicant submits additional data to complete the notice, the commission shall determine, within 30 days after receipt of that data, whether the data is sufficient to make the notice complete. The notice shall be deemed filed on the date the commission determines the notice is complete if the commission has adopted regulations specifying the informational requirements for a complete notice, but if the commission has not adopted regulations, the notice shall be deemed filed on the last date the commission receives any additional data that completes the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25517.

Except as provided in Section 25501, no construction of any thermal powerplant or electric transmission line shall be commenced by any electric utility without first obtaining certification as prescribed in this division. Any onsite improvements not qualifying as construction may be required to be restored as determined by the commission to be necessary to protect the environment, if certification is denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25518.

The Public Utilities Commission shall issue no certificate of public convenience and necessity for a site or related electrical facilities unless the utility has obtained a certificate from the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25518.5.

Nothing in this division shall preclude the concurrent initiation of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Public Utilities Commission subject to the condition specified in Section 25518.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25519.

(a) To obtain certification for a site and related facility, an application for certification of the site and related facility shall be filed with the commission. The application shall be in a form prescribed by the commission and shall be for a site and related facility that has been found to be acceptable by the commission pursuant to Section 25516, or for an additional facility at a site that has been designated a potential multiple-facility site pursuant to Section 25514.5 and found to be acceptable pursuant to Sections 25516 and 25516.5. An application for an additional facility at a potential multiple-facility site shall be subject to the conditions and review specified in Section 25520.5. An application may not be filed for a site and related facility, if there is no suitable
 alternative for the site and related facility that was previously found to be acceptable by the commission, unless the commission has approved the notice based on the one site as specified in Section 25516.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commission, upon its own motion or in response to the request of any party, may require the applicant to submit any information, document, or data that it determines is reasonably necessary to make any decision on the application.

(c) The commission shall be the lead agency as provided in Section 21165 for all projects that require certification pursuant to this chapter and for projects that are exempted from such certification pursuant to Section 25541. Unless the commission’s regulatory program governing site and facility certification and related proceedings are certified by the Natural Resources Agency pursuant to